Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 27A O.S. 2021, Section 2-7-404, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-7-404. A. To be licensed pursuant to this act the
Oklahoma Highway Remediation and Cleanup Services Act, a person,
firm, corporation, or other entity shall meet the following
requirements:
1. Principal business facilities are located within Oklahoma
this state;
2. Tow trucks are registered and licensed in Oklahoma this
state; and
3. Owner The owner is a resident of the State of Oklahoma this
state or the service is an Oklahoma corporation.
B. No operator or employee of any operator shall be permitted,
allowed, or caused to solicit business or engage in highway

remediation and cleanup services without the operator first having
obtained from the Department of Environmental Quality a license to
operate a highway remediation and cleanup service. The license
number shall be displayed, in conformance with rules of the
Department, on both sides of every vehicle operated by the highway
remediation and cleanup service. This section shall not apply to
the Oklahoma Department of Transportation or the Oklahoma Turnpike
Authority.
C. The license fee required by this section shall be in lieu of
the motor carrier filing fee as required in Section 165 of Title 47
of the Oklahoma Statutes. It shall not be necessary for any
operator to prove public convenience and necessity to obtain such
license, and the Department shall issue such license without public
hearing. The fee for such license shall be Ten Thousand Dollars
($10,000.00).
D. All licenses shall expire on the last day of the calendar
year and may be renewed annually at a cost of One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00) upon application to the Department as prescribed by
rule. No license fee shall be refunded in the event that the
license is suspended or revoked.
E. No operator or employee of any operator shall be permitted,
allowed, or caused to solicit business or engage in highway
remediation and cleanup services without the operator first having
obtained at least Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) of liability
insurance coverage. Proof of such coverage shall be submitted to
the Department of Environmental Quality at the time of the
application for a license or renewal of such license.
F. The Department is authorized to issue notices of violation
and compliance orders and to suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or
renew the license of an operator when it finds the licensee or
applicant has not complied with or has violated any of the
provisions of this act the Oklahoma Highway Remediation and Cleanup
Services Act, or any rules adopted by the Board. A suspension shall
be for a period of time deemed appropriate by the Department for the
violation. An operator whose license has been revoked may not apply
for one (1) year. Any suspended or revoked license shall be
returned to the Department by the operator. An operator whose
license is revoked by the Department shall be required to pay an
ENR. S. B. NO. 1684 Page 2

additional fee of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for
reinstatement if such reinstatement is authorized by the Department.
F. G. The Department shall keep a current list of highway
remediation and cleanup service operators licensed pursuant to this
act the Oklahoma Highway Remediation and Cleanup Services Act and
forward such list to the Department of Public Safety for
distribution to wrecker service operators licensed by the Department
of Public Safety. The Department of Environmental Quality shall
update such list regularly to delete highway remediation and cleanup
service operators whose licenses have been suspended or revoked.
G. H. Fees or fines collected pursuant to the provisions of
this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be
deposited in the Department of Environmental Quality Revolving Fund.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1684 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1684 Page 4